apertium-sh-mk/apertium-sh-mk.mk.dix.xml
    <pardef n="има__vbhaver">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>м</l>
          <r><s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>с</l>
          <r><s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ме</l>
          <r><s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>те</l>
          <r><s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ат</l>
          <r><s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


	<!-- par: може
		group: e
		cat_type: non-finite
		modall: yes
	-->

    <pardef n="мож/е__vbmod">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ам</l>
          <r>е<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>еш</l>
          <r>е<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е</l>
          <r>е<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>еме</l>
          <r>е<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ете</l>
          <r>е<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ат</l>
          <r>е<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="сме/е__vbmod">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ам</l>
          <r>е<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>еш</l>
          <r>е<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е</l>
          <r>е<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>еме</l>
          <r>е<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ете</l>
          <r>е<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ат</l>
          <r>е<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="вик/а__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ај</l>
          <r>а<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ам</l>
          <r>а<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>аш</l>
          <r>а<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а</l>
          <r>а<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>аме</l>
          <r>а<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ате</l>
          <r>а<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>аат</l>
          <r>а<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ав</l>
          <r>а<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>аше</l>
          <r>а<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>аше</l>
          <r>а<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>авме</l>
          <r>а<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>авте</l>
          <r>а<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>аа</l>
          <r>а<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

	<!-- par: знае
		group: e
		cat_type: non-finite
	-->

    <pardef n="зна/е__vblex">
	<!-- Imperativ знае -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ај</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ајте</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
	<!-- Present знае -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>м</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eш</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>еме</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ете</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ат</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
  	<!-- Imperfect -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ев</l>
          <r>а<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>аше</l>
          <r>а<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>аше</l>
          <r>а<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>авме</l>
          <r>а<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>авте</l>
          <r>а<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>еа</l>
          <r>а<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


	<!-- par: крие
		group: e
		cat_type: non-finite
		stem: a
	-->

   <e lm="има"><i>има</i><par n="има__vbhaver"/></e>
   <e lm="може"><i>мож</i><par n="мож/е__vbmod"/></e>
   <e lm="смее"><i>сме</i><par n="сме/е__vbmod"/></e>
   <e lm="знае"><par n="P__не"/><i>зна</i><par n="зна/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="вика"><i>вик</i><par n="вик/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="чита"><i>чит</i><par n="вик/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="зборува"><i>зборув</i><par n="вик/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="пишува"><i>пишув</i><par n="вик/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="прашува"><par n="P__не"/><i>прашув</i><par n="вик/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="прима"><i>прим</i><par n="вик/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="преправа"><i>преправ</i><par n="вик/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="додава"><i>додав</i><par n="вик/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="советува"><i>советув</i><par n="вик/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="одговара"><i>одговар</i><par n="вик/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="изгледа"><i>изглед</i><par n="вик/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="доближува"><i>доближув</i><par n="вик/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="пристугнива"><i>пристугнив</i><par n="вик/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="постела"><i>постел</i><par n="вик/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="почнува"><i>почнув</i><par n="вик/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="верува"><i>верув</i><par n="вик/а__vblex"/></e>
  <e lm="избра"><i>избр</i><par n="вик/а__vblex"/></e>
